Nebraska, session 109, LB909.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 26-102, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
26-102 For purposes of the Protection Orders Act:
(1) Abuse has the same meaning as in section 42-903;
(2) Course of conduct has the same meaning as in section 28-311.02;
(3) Family or household members has the same meaning as in section
42-903;
(4) Harass has the same meaning as in section 28-311.02;
(5) Household pet means any animal maintained for companionship or
pleasure but does not include any animal kept primarily for commercial
purposes or for consumption or any livestock animal as defined in section
54-902;
(6) Law enforcement agency means the police department or town
marshal in incorporated municipalities, the office of the sheriff in
unincorporated areas, and the Nebraska State Patrol; and
(7) Sexual assault offense means:
(a) Conduct amounting to sexual assault under section 28-319 or
28-320, sexual abuse by a school worker under section 28-316.01, sexual
abuse by a law enforcement officer under section 5 of this act, sexual
assault of a child under section 28-319.01 or 28-320.01, a violation of
section 28-311.08, or an attempt to commit any of such offenses; or
(b) Subjecting or attempting to subject another person to sexual
contact or sexual penetration without such person's consent, as such
terms are defined in section 28-318.
Sec. 2. Section 27-404, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
27-404 (1) Evidence of a person's character or a trait of his or her
character is not admissible for the purpose of proving that he or she
acted in conformity therewith on a particular occasion, except:
(a) Evidence of a pertinent trait of his or her character offered by
an accused, or by the prosecution to rebut the same;
-2-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
(b) Evidence of a pertinent trait of character of the victim of the
crime offered by an accused or by the prosecution to rebut the same, or
evidence of a character trait of peacefulness of the victim offered by
the prosecution in a homicide case to rebut evidence that the victim was
the first aggressor. In a sexual assault case, reputation, opinion, or
other evidence of past sexual behavior of the victim is governed by
section 27-412; or
(c) Evidence of the character of a witness as provided in sections
27-607 to 27-609.
(2) Evidence of other crimes, wrongs, or acts is not admissible to
prove the character of a person in order to show that he or she acted in
conformity therewith. It may, however, be admissible for other purposes,
such as proof of motive, opportunity, intent, preparation, plan,
knowledge, identity, or absence of mistake or accident.
(3) When such evidence is admissible pursuant to this section, in
criminal cases evidence of other crimes, wrongs, or acts of the accused
may be offered in evidence by the prosecution if the prosecution proves
to the court by clear and convincing evidence that the accused committed
the crime, wrong, or act. Such proof shall first be made outside the
presence of any jury.
(4) Regarding the admissibility in a civil or criminal action of
evidence of a person's commission of another offense or offenses of
sexual assault under sections 28-316.01 and 28-319 to 28-322.05, see
sections 27-413 to 27-415.
Sec. 3. Section 27-413, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
27-413 For purposes of sections 27-414 and 27-415, offense of sexual
assault means:
(1) Any violation of section 28-316.01, section 5 of this act, or
sections 28-319 to 28-322.5;
(b) An sexual assault under section 28-319 or 28-320, sexual abuse
-3-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
by a school worker under section 28-316.01, sexual assault of a child
under section 28-319.01 or 28-320.01, sexual assault by use of an
electronic communication device under section 28-320.02, sexual abuse of
an inmate or parolee under sections 28-322.01 to 28-322.03, sexual abuse
of a protected individual under section 28-322.04, sexual abuse of a
detainee under section 28-322.05, an attempt or conspiracy to commit any
of the crimes listed in this section; , or
(3) The the commission of or conviction for a crime in another
jurisdiction that is substantially similar to any crime listed in this
section.
Sec. 4. Section 28-101, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-101 Sections 28-101 to 28-1357, 28-1601 to 28-1603, and 28-1701
and section 5 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska
Criminal Code.
Sec. 5. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Law enforcement officer has the same meaning as in section
81-1401;
(b) Minor means a person who is at least sixteen years of age but
less than nineteen years of age;
(c) Sexual contact has the same meaning as in section 28-318; and
(d) Sexual penetration has the same meaning as in section 28-318.
(2) A law enforcement officer shall not:
(a) Subject a minor to sexual penetration or sexual contact; or
(b) Engage in a pattern or scheme of conduct to subject a minor to
sexual penetration or sexual contact.
(3) It is not a defense to a charge under this section that the
minor consented to such sexual penetration or sexual contact.
(4) Any law enforcement officer who engages in sexual penetration
with a minor is guilty of sexual abuse by a law enforcement officer in
the first degree. Sexual abuse by a law enforcement officer in the first
-4-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
degree is a Class IIA felony.
(5) Any law enforcement officer who engages in sexual contact with a
minor is guilty of sexual abuse by a law enforcement officer in the
second degree. Sexual abuse by a law enforcement officer in the second
degree is a Class IIIA felony.
(6) Any law enforcement officer who engages in a pattern or scheme
of conduct with the intent to subject a minor to sexual penetration or
sexual contact is guilty of sexual abuse by a law enforcement officer in
the third degree. Sexual abuse by a law enforcement officer in the third
degree is a Class IV felony.
Sec. 6. Section 28-318, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-318 As used in sections 28-317 to 28-322.05, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Actor means a person accused of sexual assault;
(2) Intimate parts means the genital area, groin, inner thighs,
buttocks, or breasts;
(3) Past sexual behavior means sexual behavior other than the sexual
behavior upon which the sexual assault is alleged;
(4) Serious personal injury means great bodily injury or
disfigurement, extreme mental anguish or mental trauma, pregnancy,
disease, or loss or impairment of a sexual or reproductive organ;
(5) Sexual contact means the intentional touching of the victim's
sexual or intimate parts or the intentional touching of the victim's
clothing covering the immediate area of the victim's sexual or intimate
parts. Sexual contact also means the touching by the victim of the
actor's sexual or intimate parts or the clothing covering the immediate
area of the actor's sexual or intimate parts when such touching is
intentionally caused by the actor. Sexual contact includes only such
conduct which can be reasonably construed as being for the purpose of
sexual arousal or gratification of either party. Sexual contact also
-5-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
includes the touching of a child with the actor's sexual or intimate
parts on any part of the child's body for purposes of sexual abuse by a
school worker under section 28-316.01, sexual abuse by a law enforcement
officer under section 5 of this act, or sexual assault of a child under
sections 28-319.01 and 28-320.01;
(6) Sexual penetration means sexual intercourse in its ordinary
meaning, cunnilingus, fellatio, anal intercourse, or any intrusion,
however slight, of any part of the actor's or victim's body or any object
manipulated by the actor into the genital or anal openings of the
victim's body which can be reasonably construed as being for nonmedical,
nonhealth, or nonlaw enforcement purposes. Sexual penetration shall not
require emission of semen;
(7) Victim means the person alleging to have been sexually
assaulted;
(8) Without consent means:
(a)(i) The victim was compelled to submit due to the use of force or
threat of force or coercion, or (ii) the victim expressed a lack of
consent through words, or (iii) the victim expressed a lack of consent
through conduct, or (iv) the consent, if any was actually given, was the
result of the actor's deception as to the identity of the actor or the
nature or purpose of the act on the part of the actor;
(b) The victim need only resist, either verbally or physically, so
as to make the victim's refusal to consent genuine and real and so as to
reasonably make known to the actor the victim's refusal to consent; and
(c) A victim need not resist verbally or physically where it would
be useless or futile to do so; and
(9) Force or threat of force means (a) the use of physical force
which overcomes the victim's resistance or (b) the threat of physical
force, express or implied, against the victim or a third person that
places the victim in fear of death or in fear of serious personal injury
to the victim or a third person where the victim reasonably believes that
-6-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
the actor has the present or future ability to execute the threat.
Sec. 7. Section 28-712.01, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-712.01 (1)(a) The department may assign a report for alternative
response consistent with the Child Protection and Family Safety Act.
(b) No report involving any of the following shall be assigned to
alternative response but shall be immediately forwarded to law
enforcement or the county attorney:
(i) Murder in the first or second degree as defined in section
28-303 or 28-304 or manslaughter as defined in section 28-305;
(ii) Assault in the first, second, or third degree or assault by
strangulation or suffocation as defined in section 28-308, 28-309,
28-310, or 28-310.01;
(iii) Sexual abuse, including acts prohibited by section 28-316.01,
28-319, 28-319.01, 28-320, 28-320.01, 28-320.02, 28-322.01, 28-322.02,
28-322.03, 28-322.04, 28-322.05, 28-703, or 28-707 or section 5 of this
act;
(iv) Labor trafficking of a minor or sex trafficking of a minor as
defined in section 28-830;
(v) Neglect of a minor child that results in serious bodily injury
as defined in section 28-109, requires hospitalization of the child, or
results in an injury to the child that requires ongoing medical care,
behavioral health care, or physical or occupational therapy, including a
growth delay, which may be referred to as failure to thrive, that has
been diagnosed by a physician and is due to parental neglect;
(vi) Physical abuse to the head or torso of a child or physical
abuse that results in bodily injury;
(vii) An allegation that requires a forensic interview at a child
advocacy center or coordination with the child abuse and neglect
investigation team pursuant to section 28-728;
(viii) Out-of-home child abuse or neglect;
-7-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
(ix) An allegation being investigated by a law enforcement agency at
the time of the assignment;
(x) A history of termination of parental rights;
(xi) Absence of a caretaker without having given an alternate
caregiver authority to make decisions and grant consents for necessary
care, treatment, and education of a child or without having made
provision to be contacted to make such decisions or grant such consents;
(xii) Domestic violence involving a caretaker in situations in which
the alleged perpetrator has access to the child or caretaker;
(xiii) A household member illegally manufactures methamphetamine or
opioids;
(xiv) A child has had contact with methamphetamine or other
nonprescribed opioids, including a positive drug screening or test; or
(xv) For a report involving an infant, a household member tests
positive for methamphetamine or nonprescribed opioids at the birth of
such infant.
(c) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
(i) provide additional ineligibility criteria for assignment to
alternative response and (ii) establish additional criteria requiring
review by the Review, Evaluate, and Decide Team.
(d) A report that includes any of the following may be eligible for
alternative response but shall first be reviewed by the Review, Evaluate,
and Decide Team prior to assignment to alternative response:
(i) Domestic assault as defined in section 28-323 or domestic
violence in the family home;
(ii) Use of alcohol or controlled substances as defined in section
28-401 or 28-405 by a caregiver that impairs the caregiver's ability to
care and provide safety for the child; or
(iii) A family member residing in the home or a caregiver that has
been the subject of a report accepted for traditional response or
assigned to alternative response in the past six months.
-8-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
(2) The Review, Evaluate, and Decide Team shall convene to review
reports pursuant to the department's rules, regulations, and policies, to
evaluate the information, and to determine assignment for alternative
response or traditional response. The team shall utilize consistent
criteria to review the severity of the allegation of child abuse or
neglect, access to the perpetrator, vulnerability of the child, family
history including previous reports, parental cooperation, parental or
caretaker protective factors, and other information as deemed necessary.
At the conclusion of the review, the report shall be assigned to either
traditional response or alternative response. Decisions of the team shall
be made by consensus. If the team cannot come to consensus, the report
shall be assigned for a traditional response.
(3) In the case of an alternative response, the department shall
complete a comprehensive assessment. The department shall transfer the
case being given alternative response to traditional response if the
department determines that a child is unsafe or if the concern for the
safety of the child is due to a temporary living arrangement. Upon
completion of the comprehensive assessment, if it is determined that the
child is safe, participation in services offered to the family receiving
an alternative response is voluntary, the case shall not be transferred
to traditional response based upon the family's failure to enroll or
participate in such services, and the subject of the report shall not be
entered into the central registry of child protection cases maintained
pursuant to section 28-718.
(4) The department shall, by the next working day after receipt of a
report of child abuse or neglect, enter into the tracking system of child
protection cases maintained pursuant to section 28-715 all reports of
child abuse or neglect received under this section that are opened for
alternative response and any action taken.
(5) The department shall make available to the appropriate
investigating law enforcement agency, child advocacy center, and county
-9-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
attorney a copy of all reports relative to a case of suspected child
abuse or neglect. Aggregate, nonidentifying data regarding reports of
child abuse or neglect receiving an alternative response shall be made
available quarterly to requesting agencies outside the department. Such
alternative response data shall include, but not be limited to, the
nature of the initial child abuse or neglect report, the age of the child
or children, the nature of services offered, the location of the cases,
the number of cases per month, and the number of alternative response
cases that were transferred to traditional response. Other than the
office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare, the Public
Counsel, law enforcement agency personnel, child advocacy center
employees, and county attorneys, no other agency or individual shall be
provided specific, identifying reports of child abuse or neglect being
given alternative response. The office of Inspector General of Nebraska
Child Welfare shall have access to all reports relative to cases of
suspected child abuse or neglect subject to traditional response and
those subject to alternative response. The department and the office
shall develop procedures allowing for the Inspector General's review of
cases subject to alternative response. The Inspector General shall
include in the report pursuant to section 50-1818 a summary of all cases
reviewed pursuant to this subsection.
Sec. 8. Section 28-1701, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-1701 (1) A person shall not be arrested or prosecuted for an
eligible alcohol or drug offense if such person witnessed or was the
victim of a sexual assault and such person:
(a) Either:
(i) In good faith, reported such sexual assault to law enforcement;
or
(ii) Requested emergency medical assistance for the victim of the
sexual assault; and
-10-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
(b) Evidence supporting the arrest or prosecution of the eligible
alcohol or drug offense was obtained or discovered as a result of such
person reporting such sexual assault to law enforcement or requesting
emergency medical assistance.
(2) A person shall not be arrested or prosecuted for an eligible
alcohol or drug offense if:
(a) Evidence supporting the arrest or prosecution of the person for
the offense was obtained or discovered as a result of the investigation
or prosecution of a sexual assault; and
(b) Such person cooperates with law enforcement in the investigation
or prosecution of the sexual assault.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) Eligible alcohol or drug offense means:
(i) A violation of subsection (3) or (13) of section 28-416 or of
section 28-441;
(ii) A violation of section 53-180.02 committed by a person older
than eighteen years of age and under the age of twenty-one years, as
described in subdivision (4)(a) of section 53-180.05;
(iii) A violation of a city or village ordinance similar to
subdivision (3)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section; or
(iv) Attempt, conspiracy, solicitation, being an accessory to,
aiding and abetting, aiding the consummation of, or compounding a felony
with any of the offenses in subdivision (3)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
section as the underlying offense; and
(b) Sexual assault means:
(i) A violation of section 28-316.01, 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-320,
28-320.01, 28-320.02, 28-322.01, 28-322.02, 28-322.03, 28-322.04,
28-322.05, 28-703, or 28-1805 or section 5 of this act, sex trafficking
or sex trafficking of a minor under section 28-831, or subdivision (1)(c)
or (g) of section 28-386 or subdivision (1)(d), (e), or (f) of section
28-707; or
-11-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
(ii) Attempt, conspiracy, solicitation, being an accessory to,
aiding and abetting, aiding the consummation of, or compounding a felony
with any of the offenses listed in subdivision (3)(b)(i) of this section
as the underlying offense.
Sec. 9. Section 29-4003, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
29-4003 (1)(a) The Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any
person who on or after January 1, 1997:
(i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any of the following:
(A) Kidnapping of a minor pursuant to section 28-313, except when
the person is the parent of the minor and was not convicted of any other
offense in this section;
(B) False imprisonment of a minor pursuant to section 28-314 or
28-315;
(C) Sexual assault pursuant to section 28-319 or 28-320;
(D) Sexual abuse by a school worker pursuant to section 28-316.01;
(E) Sexual abuse by a law enforcement officer pursuant to section 5
of this act;
(F) (E) Sexual assault of a child in the second or third degree
pursuant to section 28-320.01;
(G) (F) Sexual assault of a child in the first degree pursuant to
section 28-319.01;
(H) (G) Sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult or senior adult pursuant
to subdivision (1)(c) of section 28-386;
(I) (H) Incest of a minor pursuant to section 28-703;
(J) (I) Pandering of a minor pursuant to section 28-802;
(K) (J) Conduct relating to child sexual abuse material under
section 28-1805 or subdivision (2)(b) or (c) of section 28-1804;
(L) (K) Knowingly possessing or receiving any child sexual abuse
material pursuant to subsection (1) or (5) of section 28-1803;
-12-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
(M) (L) Criminal child enticement pursuant to section 28-311;
(N) (M) Child enticement by means of an electronic communication
device pursuant to section 28-320.02;
(O) (N) Debauching a minor pursuant to section 28-805; or
(P) (O) Attempt, solicitation, aiding or abetting, being an
accessory, or conspiracy to commit an offense listed in subdivisions (1)
(a)(i)(A) through (1)(a)(i)(P) (1)(a)(i)(N) of this section;
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable
offense under subdivision (1)(a)(i) of this section by any village, town,
city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United
States, by the United States Government, by court-martial or other
military tribunal, or by a foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a
procedure comparable in effect to that described under section 29-2264 or
any other procedure to nullify a conviction other than by pardon;
(iii) Is incarcerated in a jail, a penal or correctional facility,
or any other public or private institution or is under probation or
parole as a result of pleading guilty to or being found guilty of a
registrable offense under subdivision (1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section
prior to January 1, 1997; or
(iv) Enters the state and is required to register as a sex offender
under the laws of another village, town, city, state, territory,
commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States.
(b) In addition to the registrable offenses under subdivision (1)(a)
of this section, the Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any person
who on or after January 1, 2010:
(i)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(b)(i)(B) of this
section, has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any of the following:
(I) Murder in the first degree pursuant to section 28-303;
(II) Murder in the second degree pursuant to section 28-304;
-13-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
(III) Manslaughter pursuant to section 28-305;
(IV) Assault in the first degree pursuant to section 28-308;
(V) Assault in the second degree pursuant to section 28-309;
(VI) Assault in the third degree pursuant to section 28-310;
(VII) Stalking pursuant to section 28-311.03;
(VIII) Violation of section 28-311.08 requiring registration under
the act pursuant to subsection (6) of section 28-311.08;
(IX) Kidnapping pursuant to section 28-313;
(X) False imprisonment pursuant to section 28-314 or 28-315;
(XI) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the first degree
pursuant to section 28-322.02;
(XII) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the second degree
pursuant to section 28-322.03;
(XIII) Sexual abuse of a protected individual pursuant to section
28-322.04;
(XIV) Incest pursuant to section 28-703;
(XV) Child abuse pursuant to subdivision (1)(d) or (e) of section
28-707;
(XVI) Enticement by electronic communication device pursuant to
section 28-833; or
(XVII) Attempt, solicitation, aiding or abetting, being an
accessory, or conspiracy to commit an offense listed in subdivisions (1)
(b)(i)(A)(I) through (1)(b)(i)(A)(XVI) of this section.
(B) In order for the Sex Offender Registration Act to apply to the
offenses listed in subdivisions (1)(b)(i)(A)(I), (II), (III), (IV), (V),
(VI), (VII), (IX), and (X) of this section, a court shall have found that
evidence of sexual penetration or sexual contact, as those terms are
defined in section 28-318, was present in the record, which shall include
consideration of the factual basis for a plea-based conviction and
information contained in the presentence report;
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
-14-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable
offense under subdivision (1)(b)(i) of this section by any village, town,
city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United
States, by the United States Government, by court-martial or other
military tribunal, or by a foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a
procedure comparable in effect to that described under section 29-2264 or
any other procedure to nullify a conviction other than by pardon; or
(iii) Enters the state and is required to register as a sex offender
under the laws of another village, town, city, state, territory,
commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States.
(c) In addition to the registrable offenses under subdivisions (1)
(a) and (b) of this section, the Sex Offender Registration Act applies to
any person who on or after January 1, 2020:
(i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of sexual abuse of a detainee under section 28-322.05; or
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable
offense under subdivision (1)(c)(i) of this section by any village, town,
city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United
States, by the United States Government, by court-martial or other
military tribunal, or by a foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a
procedure comparable in effect to that described under section 29-2264 or
any other procedure to nullify a conviction other than by pardon.
(d) In addition to the registrable offenses under subdivisions (1)
(a), (b), and (c) of this section, the Sex Offender Registration Act
applies to any person who on or after January 1, 2023:
(i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of human trafficking under subsection (1) or (2) of section
28-831, and the court determines either by notification of sex offender
registration responsibilities or notation in the sentencing order that
the human trafficking was sex trafficking or sex trafficking of a minor
-15-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
and not solely labor trafficking or labor trafficking of a minor; or
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable
offense under subdivision (1)(d)(i) of this section by any village, town,
city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United
States, by the United States Government, by court-martial or other
military tribunal, or by a foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a
procedure comparable in effect to that described under section 29-2264 or
any other procedure to nullify a conviction other than by pardon.
(2) A person appealing a conviction of a registrable offense under
this section shall be required to comply with the act during the appeals
process.
Sec. 10. Section 29-4309, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
29-4309 For the purposes of the Sexual Assault Victims' Bill of
Rights Act:
(1)(a) Advocate means:
(i) Any employee or supervised volunteer of a domestic violence and
sexual assault victim assistance program or of any other agency,
business, or organization that is not affiliated with a law enforcement
or prosecutor's office, whose primary purpose is assisting domestic
violence and sexual assault victims. This includes employees or
supervised volunteers of an Indian tribe or a postsecondary educational
institution;
(ii) A representative from a victim and witness assistance center as
established in sections 81-1845 to 81-1847 or a similar entity affiliated
with a law enforcement agency or prosecutor's office; or
(iii) An advocate who is employed by a child advocacy center that
meets the requirements of subsection (2) of section 28-728.
(b) If reasonably possible, an advocate shall speak the victim's
preferred language or use the services of a qualified interpreter;
-16-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
(2) Health care provider means any individual who is licensed,
certified, or registered to perform specified health services consistent
with state law;
(3) Sexual assault means a violation of section 28-316.01, 28-319,
28-319.01, 28-320, 28-320.01, 28-320.02, 28-322.01, 28-322.02, 28-322.03,
28-322.04, 28-322.05, 28-703, or 28-1805 or section 5 of this act, sex
trafficking or sex trafficking of a minor under section 28-831, or
subdivision (1)(c) or (g) of section 28-386 or subdivision (1)(d), (e),
or (f) of section 28-707;
(4) Sexual assault forensic evidence means evidence collected by a
health care provider contained within any sexual assault forensic
evidence collection kit, including a toxicology kit, or any forensic
evidence collected by law enforcement through the course of an
investigation; and
(5)(a) Sexual assault victim or victim means any person who is a
victim of sexual assault who reports such sexual assault:
(i) To a health care provider, law enforcement, or an advocate,
including anonymous reporting as provided in section 28-902; and
(ii) In the case of a victim who is under eighteen years of age, to
the Department of Health and Human Services.
(b) Sexual assault victim or victim also includes, if the victim
described in subdivision (5)(a) of this section is incompetent, deceased,
or a minor who is unable to consent to counseling services, such victim's
parent, guardian, or spouse, unless such person is the reported
assailant.
Sec. 11. Section 29-4316, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
29-4316 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Criminal justice agency has the same meaning as in section
29-3509;
(b) Sex trafficking means sex trafficking or sex trafficking of a
-17-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
minor in violation of section 28-831; and
(c) Sexual assault means a violation of section 28-319, 28-316.01,
28-319.01, 28-320, 28-320.01, 28-320.02, 28-322.01, 28-322.02, 28-322.03,
28-322.04, 28-322.05, 28-703, or 28-1805 or section 5 of this act or
subdivision (1)(c) or (g) of section 28-386 or subdivision (1)(d), (e),
or (f) of section 28-707.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, and unless
otherwise required by statute, a criminal justice agency and any attorney
involved in the investigation or prosecution of an alleged sexual assault
or sex trafficking violation shall maintain the confidentiality of the
identity and personal identifying information of the alleged victim. Such
information may be shared by such criminal justice agencies and between
such criminal justice agencies and attorneys as necessary to carry out
their duties.
(3) The confidentiality required by subsection (2) of this section
does not apply:
(a) To the extent waived by the alleged victim;
(b) If criminal charges involving the alleged sexual assault or sex
trafficking are filed;
(c) If the victim has died as a result of, or in connection with,
the alleged sexual assault or sex trafficking;
(d) In cases where personal identifying information or the identity
of the victim are released as part of a child abduction alert system used
by law enforcement agencies, such as the AMBER Alert system;
(e) To a person making a report of suspected child abuse or neglect
as required in section 28-711;
(f) To the sharing of reports and information regarding child abuse
and neglect with a child abuse and neglect investigation team or child
abuse and neglect treatment team provided for in section 28-728;
(g) To the Department of Health and Human Services and other
assisting agencies as necessary to carry out their duties in
-18-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
investigations of child abuse or neglect;
(h) To communication with an individual that an educational entity,
as defined in section 79-1201.01, has designated:
(i) As a Title IX coordinator; or
(ii) To receive reports related to sexual assault or sex trafficking
or to provide supportive measures related to such reports; or
(i) To communication with advocates and health care providers as
defined in section 29-4309.
Sec. 12. Section 81-1850, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1850 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Covered offense means:
(i) Murder in the first degree, section 28-303;
(ii) Murder in the second degree, section 28-304;
(iii) Manslaughter, section 28-305;
(iv) Motor vehicle homicide, section 28-306;
(v) Assault in the first degree, section 28-308;
(vi) Assault in the second degree, section 28-309;
(vii) Assault by strangulation or suffocation, section 28-310.01;
(viii) Terroristic threats, section 28-311.01;
(ix) Stalking, section 28-311.03;
(x) Kidnapping, section 28-313;
(xi) False imprisonment in the first degree, section 28-314;
(xii) Sexual abuse by a school employee, section 28-316.01;
(xiii) Sexual abuse by a law enforcement officer, section 5 of this
act;
(xiv) (xiii) Sexual assault in the first degree, section 28-319;
(xv) (xiv) Sexual assault of a child in the first degree, section
28-319.01;
(xvi) (xv) Sexual assault in the second degree, section 28-320;
(xvii) (xvi) Sexual assault of a child in the second or third
-19-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
degree, section 28-320.01;
(xviii) (xvii) Child enticement by means of an electronic
communication device, section 28-320.02;
(xix) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee, section 28-322.02;
(xx) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee, section 28-322.03;
(xxi) (xviii) Sexual abuse of a protected individual, section
28-322.04;
(xxii) Sexual abuse of a detainee, section 28-322.05;
(xxiii) (xix) Domestic assault in the first or second degree,
section 28-323;
(xxiv) (xx) Sex trafficking, sex trafficking of a minor, labor
trafficking, or labor trafficking of a minor, section 28-831; or
(xxv) (xxi) An attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit an
offense listed in subdivision (1)(a) of this section; and
(b) Victim has the same meaning as in section 29-119.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of this section,
when a person is convicted of a felony, the county attorney shall forward
the name and address of any victim of such convicted person to the Board
of Parole, the Department of Correctional Services, the county
corrections agency, the Department of Health and Human Services, and the
Board of Pardons, as applicable.
(b) A victim may waive the right to notification under this section
by notifying the county attorney, in which case the county attorney is
not required to comply with subdivision (2)(a) of this section.
(c) The Board of Parole, the Department of Correctional Services,
the county corrections agency, the Department of Health and Human
Services, and the Board of Pardons shall include the victim's name in the
file of the convicted person, but the name shall not be part of the
public record of any parole or pardons hearings of the convicted person.
(d) Any victim, including a victim who has waived his or her right
to notification, may request the notification prescribed in this section,
-20-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
as applicable, by sending a written request to the Board of Parole, the
Department of Correctional Services, the county corrections agency, the
Department of Health and Human Services, or the Board of Pardons any time
after the convicted person is incarcerated and until the convicted person
is no longer under the jurisdiction of the Board of Parole, the county
corrections agency, the Department of Correctional Services, or the Board
of Pardons or, if the convicted person is under the jurisdiction of the
Department of Health and Human Services, within the three-year period
after the convicted person is no longer under the jurisdiction of the
Board of Parole, the county corrections agency, the Department of
Correctional Services, or the Board of Pardons.
(3) A victim whose name appears in the file of the convicted person
shall be notified by the Board of Parole:
(a) Within ninety days after conviction of an offender, of the
tentative date of release and the earliest parole eligibility date of
such offender;
(b) Of any parole hearings or proceedings;
(c) Of any decision of the Board of Parole;
(d) When a convicted person who is on parole is returned to custody
because of parole violations; and
(e) If the convicted person has been adjudged a mentally disordered
sex offender or is a convicted sex offender, when such convicted person
is released from custody or treatment.
Such notification shall be given in person, by telecommunication, or
by mail.
(4) A victim whose name appears in the file of the convicted person
shall be notified by the Department of Correctional Services or a county
corrections agency:
(a) When a convicted person is granted a furlough or release from
incarceration for twenty-four hours or longer or any transfer of the
convicted person to community status;
-21-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
(b) When a convicted person is released into community-based
programs, including educational release and work release programs. Such
notification shall occur at the beginning and termination of any such
program;
(c) When a convicted person escapes or does not return from a
granted furlough or release and again when the convicted person is
returned into custody;
(d) When a convicted person is discharged from custody upon
completion of his or her sentence. Such notice shall be given at least
thirty days before discharge, when practicable;
(e) Of the (i) department's calculation of the earliest parole
eligibility date of the prisoner with all potential good time or
disciplinary credits considered if the sentence exceeds ninety days or
(ii) county corrections agency's calculation of the earliest release date
of the prisoner. The victim may request one notice of the calculation
described in this subdivision. Such information shall be mailed not later
than thirty days after receipt of the request;
(f) Of any reduction in the prisoner's minimum sentence; and
(g) Of the victim's right to submit a statement as provided in
section 81-1848.
(5) A victim whose name appears in the file of a convicted person
shall be notified by the Department of Health and Human Services:
(a) When a person described in subsection (6) of this section
becomes the subject of a petition pursuant to the Nebraska Mental Health
Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act prior to his or her
discharge from custody upon the completion of his or her sentence or
within thirty days after such discharge. The county attorney who filed
the petition shall notify the Department of Correctional Services of such
petition. The Department of Correctional Services shall forward the names
and addresses of victims appearing in the file of the convicted person to
the Department of Health and Human Services; and
-22-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
(b) When a person under a mental health board commitment pursuant to
subdivision (a) of this subsection:
(i) Escapes from an inpatient facility providing board-ordered
treatment and again when the person is returned to an inpatient facility;
(ii) Is discharged or has a change in disposition from inpatient
board-ordered treatment;
(iii) Is granted a furlough or release for twenty-four hours or
longer; and
(iv) Is released into educational release programs or work release
programs. Such notification shall occur at the beginning and termination
of any such program.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section applies to a person convicted of
a covered offense which is also alleged to be the recent act or threat
underlying the commitment of such person as mentally ill and dangerous or
as a dangerous sex offender as defined in section 83-174.01.
(7) A victim whose name appears in the file of a person convicted of
a covered offense shall be notified, via certified mail, by the Board of
Pardons:
(a) Of any pardon or commutation proceedings at least thirty
calendar days prior to the proceedings; and
(b) If a pardon or commutation has been granted, within ten days
after such granting.
(8) The Board of Parole, the Department of Correctional Services,
the Department of Health and Human Services, and the Board of Pardons
shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as needed to carry out
this section.
(9) The victim's address and telephone number maintained by the
Department of Correctional Services, the Department of Health and Human
Services, the county corrections agency, the Board of Parole, and the
Board of Pardons pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be
exempt from disclosure under Nebraska public records laws and federal
-23-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
freedom of information laws, as such federal laws existed on January 1,
2004.
Sec. 13. Section 83-4,143, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-4,143 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Board of
Parole may recommend placement of felony offenders at the incarceration
work camp. The offenders recommended by the board shall be offenders
currently housed at other Department of Correctional Services adult
correctional facilities and shall complete the incarceration work camp
programming prior to release on parole.
(2) When the Board of Parole is of the opinion that a felony
offender currently incarcerated in a Department of Correctional Services
adult correctional facility may benefit from a brief and intensive period
of regimented, structured, and disciplined programming immediately prior
to release on parole, the board may direct placement of such an offender
in an incarceration work camp for a period not to exceed one hundred
eighty days as a condition of release on parole. The board may consider
such placement if the felony offender (a) is medically and mentally fit
to participate, with allowances given for reasonable accommodation as
determined by medical and mental health professionals, and (b) has not
previously been incarcerated for a violent felony crime, and (c) is not
incarcerated for a covered offense. Offenders convicted of a crime under
sections 28-319 to 28-322.05 or of any capital crime are not eligible to
be placed in an incarceration work camp.
(3) The Director of Correctional Services may assign a felony
offender to an incarceration work camp if he or she believes it is in the
best interests of the felony offender and of society, except that
offenders incarcerated for covered offenses convicted of a crime under
sections 28-319 to 28-322.05 or of any capital crime are not eligible to
be assigned to an incarceration work camp pursuant to this subsection.
(4) For purposes of this section, covered offense means:
-24-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
(a) A capital crime; or
(b) A violation of section 28-316 or section 5 of this act or
sections 28-319 to 28-322.05.
Sec. 14. Section 84-941.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-941.01 Potentially disqualifying conviction includes a conviction
for:
(1) Criminal attempt as provided in section 28-201, conspiracy as
provided in section 28-202, or aiding and abetting as provided in section
28-206, to commit an offense listed in this section;
(2) Murder as provided in sections 28-303 or 28-304;
(3) Manslaughter as provided in section 28-305;
(4) Motor vehicle homicide as provided in section 28-306;
(5) Assault in the first or second degree as provided in sections
28-308 and 28-309;
(6) Terroristic threats as provided in section 28-311.01;
(7) Stalking as provided in section 28-311.03;
(8) Kidnapping as provided in section 28-313;
(9) False imprisonment as provided in sections 28-314 and 28-315;
(10) A sexual act subject to criminal penalties as provided in
section 28-316.01 or section 5 of this act or sections 28-317 to
28-322.05;
(11) Domestic assault as provided in section 28-323;
(12) Robbery as provided in section 28-324;
(13) Arson as provided in sections 28-502, 28-503, and 28-504;
(14) Fraud subject to criminal penalties as provided in sections
28-505, 28-631, 28-638, 28-639, 28-640, and 28-935;
(15) Theft as provided in sections 28-511, 28-512, 28-513, and
28-515;
(16) Forgery as provided in sections 28-602 and 28-603;
(17) Incest as provided in section 28-703;
-25-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
(18) Child abuse as provided in section 28-707;
(19) Human trafficking, labor trafficking, sex trafficking, labor
trafficking of a minor, or sex trafficking of a minor as provided in
section 28-831;
(20) False reporting as provided in section 28-907;
(21) Perjury as provided in section 28-915;
(22) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain
employees, or a health care professional in the first degree as provided
in section 28-929;
(23) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain
employees, or a health care professional in the second degree as provided
in section 28-930;
(24) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain
employees, or a health care professional in the third degree as provided
in section 28-931;
(25) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain
employees, or a health care professional using a motor vehicle as
provided in section 28-931.01;
(26) An offense that has as an element the threat to inflict serious
bodily injury as defined in section 28-109 or death on another person,
the intentional infliction of serious bodily injury as defined in section
28-109 on another person, or intentionally causing the death of another
person;
(27) An offense for which registration is required under the Sex
Offender Registration Act; or
(28) Any offense under the laws of another jurisdiction that is
substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in this section.
Sec. 15. Original sections 83-4,143 and 84-941.01, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, section 27-404, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and sections 26-102, 27-413, 28-101, 28-318, 28-712.01,
28-1701, 29-4003, 29-4309, 29-4316, and 81-1850, Revised Statutes
-26-

LB909 LB909
2026 2026
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-27-